District of Columbia statutes.
5-1003

Attendance of witnesses — Neglect or refusal to obey subpoena.

If any witness, having been personally summoned, shall neglect or refuse to obey the subpoena issued in § 5-1001, then in that event the chairman of the trial board may report that fact to the Superior Court of the District of Columbia or 1 of the judges thereof and said Court, or any judge thereof, is empowered to compel obedience to said subpoena to the same extent as witnesses may be compelled to obey the subpoenas of that Court.

May 11, 1892, 27 Stat. 29, ch. 65, § 3
Feb. 20, 1896, 29 Stat. 10, ch. 25, § 3
Apr. 16, 1932, 47 Stat. 87, ch. 118, § 2
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(a), (b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 571, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(c)(14)(B)
Insanitary buildings, condemnation, condemnation review board, see § 6-902.
Investigations and examinations, see § 5-1021.
Merit system, application to police officers and firefighters, see § 1-632.03.
This section is referenced in § 6-902.
1981 Ed., § 4-803.
1973 Ed., § 4-603.